Wyoming, session 2025, SF0019.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-12-105(c), 39-15-111(c),
(d)(intro) and by creating a new subsection (r) and
39-16-111(d), (e)(intro) and by creating a new subsection
(p) are amended to read:

SF0019

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0069
35-12-105. Appointment and duties of administrator;
staff; rules and regulations.

(c) The director, administrator and the staff of the
division are authorized to the extent possible, at the
request of local governments, to provide technical
assistance to local governments in the preparation of
anticipated impacts related to a proposed project
consistent with W.S. 39-15-111(c), and (d) and (r) and
39-16-111(d), and (e) and (p) and negotiation of agreements
with applicants as provided for in W.S. 35-12-107.

39-15-111. Distribution.

(c) If any person commences after the effective date
of this act to construct an industrial facility, as that
term is defined in W.S. 35-12-102, under a permit issued
pursuant to W.S. 35-12-106, or if the federal or state
government commences to construct any project within this
state with an estimated construction cost as specified in
the definition of industrial facility in W.S. 35-12-102 the
department of revenue shall thereafter pay to the county
treasurer and the county treasurer will distribute to the
SF0019

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0069
county, cities and towns of that county in which the
industrial facility or project is located, impact
assistance payments from the monies available under
paragraph (b)(i) of this section. Each payment to the
county treasurer shall be equal to an amount determined by
the industrial siting council under this subsection and
shall continue during the period of construction except
that in the case of an industrial facility or a federal or
state government project which is expected to continue in
phases for an indefinite period of time, the department of
revenue shall discontinue payments under this section when
construction of any phase has ceased or been substantially
completed for twelve (12) consecutive months. The person
constructing the industrial facility and the counties
affected by the construction of the industrial facility
shall provide evidence at the public hearing held pursuant
to W.S. 35-12-110(f)(i) of the mitigated and unmitigated
impacts that the construction will have on the counties,
cities and towns determined by the industrial siting
council to be affected by the construction of the
industrial facility. The industrial siting council shall
review the evidence of the impacts and determine, applying
a preponderance of evidence standard, the dollar amount of
SF0019

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0069
the unmitigated impacts. The council shall state, in the
order issued under W.S. 35-12-113(a), the total dollar
amount of the impact assistance payment and include
specific findings of fact detailing the basis for the total
dollar amount determination and if requested by the
affected county, city or town, its justification for
rejecting, in whole or in part, an application for an
impact assistance payment. The impact assistance payment
shall be distributed by the department of revenue in an
amount and on a schedule determined by the council, based
on evidence presented at the hearing. Under no
circumstances shall the total dollar amount of the impact
assistance payment exceed the maximum allowable percentage
specified in this subsection of the total estimated
material costs of the facility, as those costs are
determined by the council. The maximum allowable percentage
shall be two and twenty-five hundredths percent (2.25%) for
facilities with total estimated materials costs of three
hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000.00) or less
except as otherwise provided in this subsection, two
percent (2%) for facilities with total estimated materials
costs in excess of three hundred fifty million dollars
($350,000,000.00) but less than eight hundred fifty million
SF0019

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0069
dollars ($850,000,000.00) and one and one-half percent
(1.50%) for facilities with total estimated materials costs
of eight hundred fifty million dollars ($850,000,000.00) or
more. For facilities with total estimated materials costs
of three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000.00) or
less, the council may increase the maximum allowable
percentage to not more than two and seventy-six hundredths
percent (2.76%) if the council includes in the specific
findings required under this subsection that the maximum
allowable percentage of two and twenty-five hundredths
percent (2.25%) is insufficient to mitigate the identified
impacts. For facilities with total estimated materials
costs exceeding three hundred fifty million dollars
($350,000,000.00), the council may increase the maximum
allowable percentage to not more than two and seventy-six
hundredths percent (2.76%) in accordance with subsection
(r) of this section. The council shall submit a report to
the joint appropriations committee and the joint minerals,
business and economic development interim committee not
later than ten (10) business days after increasing the
maximum allowable percentage as specified in this
subsection, including data to support the increase. The
impact assistance payments shall be distributed to the
SF0019

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0069
county treasurer and the county treasurer will distribute
to the county and to the cities and towns therein based on
a ratio established by the industrial siting council during
a public hearing held in accordance with W.S.
35-12-110(f)(i). In determining the distribution ratio, the
industrial siting council may consider the extent and
location of the unmitigated impacts, the populations of the
affected counties, cities and towns, including any
disproportionate impacts on smaller communities, and any
other equitable factor. The industrial siting council shall
review the distribution ratio for construction projects on
a regular basis and make appropriate adjustments. A
governing body which is primarily affected by the facility,
or any person issued a permit pursuant to W.S. 35-12-106,
may petition the industrial siting council for review and
adjustment of the distribution ratio or the amount of the
impact assistance payment upon a showing of good cause. The
impact assistance payment shall be in addition to all other
distributions under this section, but no impact assistance
payment shall be made for any period in which the county or
counties are not imposing at least a one percent (1%) tax
authorized by W.S. 39-15-204(a)(i) and 39-16-204(a)(i) or
at least a total of a two percent (2%) sales tax authorized
SF0019

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0069
under W.S. 39-15-204(a)(i), (iii) and (vi) and at least a
total of a two percent (2%) use tax authorized under W.S.
39-16-204(a)(i), (ii) and (v). For purposes of this
subsection, the industrial facility or federal or state
government project will be deemed to be located in the
county in which a majority of the construction costs will
be expended, provided that upon a request from the county
commissioners of any adjoining county to the industrial
siting council, the council may determine that the social
and economic impacts from construction of the industrial
facility or federal or state government project upon the
adjoining county are significant and establish the ratio of
impacts between the counties and certify that ratio to the
department of revenue who will thereafter distribute the
impact assistance payment to the counties pursuant to that
ratio. Each county, city and town that receives a
distribution under this subsection shall provide an annual
report to the industrial siting council describing how the
impact assistance payment was expended. The report shall
first be submitted not later than one (1) year after the
impact assistance payment is approved and annually each
year thereafter for the duration in which distributions are
made and until all distributions are expended. The
SF0019

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0069
industrial siting council shall adopt rules as necessary to
implement this subsection.

(d) As used in subsection subsections (c) and (r) of
this section:

(r) For industrial facilities for which the total
estimated materials costs exceed three hundred fifty
million dollars ($350,000,000.00), the industrial siting
council may increase the maximum allowable percentage of
any impact assistance payment to not more than two and
seventy-six hundredths percent (2.76%) in accordance with
the following:

(i) The council shall include in the specific
findings required under subsection (c) of this section that
the maximum allowable percentage, as applicable, for the
industrial facility is insufficient to mitigate the
identified impacts;

(ii) Upon making the findings required in
paragraph (i) of this subsection, the council shall forward
the proposed percentage increase, the permit order or
SF0019

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0069
decision and, if requested by the board, the record of the
hearing, to the state loan and investment board. The board
shall not accept or consider any new evidence in its
consideration under this paragraph. Not later than the next
regularly scheduled board meeting after receiving a
proposed percentage increase for an impact assistance
payment, the state loan and investment board shall consider
the council's proposed percentage increase and shall:

(A) Approve the proposed percentage
increase;

(B) Deny the proposed percentage increase;
or

(C) Modify the proposed percentage increase
to any percentage between the maximum allowable percentage
as specified under subsection (c) of this section and two
and seventy-six hundredths percent (2.76%).

(iii) The council shall authorize that payments
made under subsection (c) of this section be made at a
percentage not to exceed the applicable maximum allowable
SF0019

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0069
percentage specified in subsection (c) of this section
while the proposed percentage increase is pending before
the state loan and investment board;

(iv) If the state loan and investment board
approves or modifies the proposed percentage increase under
paragraph (ii) of this subsection and upon direction by the
council, the department shall make payments in an amount
sufficient to make the payments equal to the amount
necessary to make the impact assistance payment's increased
percentage retroactive to the beginning of the period of
construction;

(v) The decision of the state loan and
investment board to approve, deny or modify a proposed
percentage increase under paragraph (ii) of this subsection
is final and shall not be subject to further review by the
industrial siting council or subject to any judicial
review. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to
abrogate any other right of review specified in the
Industrial Development Information and Siting Act.

39-16-111. Distribution.
SF0019

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0069

(d) If any person commences after the effective date
of this act to construct an industrial facility, as that
term is defined in W.S. 35-12-102, under a permit issued
pursuant to W.S. 35-12-106, or if the federal or state
government commences to construct any project within this
state with an estimated construction cost as specified in
the definition of industrial facility in W.S. 35-12-102 the
department of revenue shall thereafter pay to the county
treasurer and the county treasurer will distribute to the
county, cities and towns of that county in which the
industrial facility or project is located, impact
assistance payments from the monies available under
paragraph (b)(i) of this section. Each payment to the
county treasurer shall be equal to an amount determined by
the industrial siting council under this subsection and
shall continue during the period of construction except
that in the case of an industrial facility or a federal or
state government project which is expected to continue in
phases for an indefinite period of time, the department of
revenue shall discontinue payments under this section when
construction of any phase has ceased or been substantially
completed for twelve (12) consecutive months. The person
SF0019

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0069
constructing the industrial facility and the counties
affected by the construction of the industrial facility
shall provide evidence at the public hearing held pursuant
to W.S. 35-12-110(f)(i) of the mitigated and unmitigated
impacts that the construction will have on the counties,
cities and towns determined by the industrial siting
council to be affected by the construction of the
industrial facility. The industrial siting council shall
review the evidence of the impacts and determine, applying
a preponderance of evidence standard, the dollar amount of
the unmitigated impacts. The council shall state, in the
order issued under W.S. 35-12-113(a), the total dollar
amount of the impact assistance payment and include
specific findings of fact detailing the basis for the total
dollar amount determination and if requested by the
affected county, city or town, its justification for
rejecting, in whole or in part, an application for an
impact assistance payment. The impact assistance payment
shall be distributed by the department of revenue in an
amount and on a schedule determined by the council, based
on evidence presented at the hearing. Under no
circumstances shall the total dollar amount of the impact
assistance payment exceed the maximum allowable percentage
SF0019

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0069
specified in this subsection of the total estimated
material costs of the facility, as those costs are
determined by the council. The maximum allowable percentage
shall be two and twenty-five hundredths percent (2.25%) for
facilities with total estimated materials costs of three
hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000.00) or less
except as otherwise provided in this subsection, two
percent (2%) for facilities with total estimated materials
costs in excess of three hundred fifty million dollars
($350,000,000.00) but less than eight hundred fifty million
dollars ($850,000,000.00) and one and one-half percent
(1.50%) for facilities with total estimated materials costs
of eight hundred fifty million dollars ($850,000,000.00) or
more. For facilities with total estimated materials costs
of three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000.00) or
less, the council may increase the maximum allowable
percentage to not more than two and seventy-six hundredths
percent (2.76%) if the council includes in the specific
findings required under this subsection that the maximum
allowable percentage of two and twenty-five hundredths
percent (2.25%) is insufficient to mitigate the identified
impacts. For facilities with total estimated materials
costs exceeding three hundred fifty million dollars
SF0019

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0069
($350,000,000.00), the council may increase the maximum
allowable percentage to not more than two and seventy-six
hundredths percent (2.76%) in accordance with subsection
(p) of this section. The council shall submit a report to
the joint appropriations committee and the joint minerals,
business and economic development interim committee not
later than ten (10) business days after increasing the
maximum allowable percentage as specified in this
subsection, including data to support the increase. The
impact assistance payments shall be distributed to the
county treasurer and the county treasurer will distribute
to the county and to the cities and towns therein based on
a ratio established by the industrial siting council during
a public hearing held in accordance with W.S.
35-12-110(f)(i). In determining the distribution ratio, the
industrial siting council may consider the extent and
location of the unmitigated impacts, the populations of the
affected counties, cities and towns, including any
disproportionate impacts on smaller communities, and any
other equitable factor. The industrial siting council shall
review the distribution ratio for construction projects on
a regular basis and make appropriate adjustments. A
governing body which is primarily affected by the facility,
SF0019

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0069
or any person issued a permit pursuant to W.S. 35-12-106,
may petition the industrial siting council for review and
adjustment of the distribution ratio or the amount of the
impact assistance payment upon a showing of good cause.
The impact assistance payment shall be in addition to all
other distributions under this section, but no impact
assistance payment shall be made for any period in which
the county or counties are not imposing at least a one
percent (1%) tax authorized by W.S. 39-15-204(a)(i) and
39-16-204(a)(i) or at least a total of a two percent (2%)
sales tax authorized under W.S. 39-15-204(a)(i), (iii) and
(vi) and at least a total of a two percent (2%) use tax
authorized under W.S. 39-16-204(a)(i), (ii) and (v). For
purposes of this subsection, the industrial facility or
federal or state government project will be deemed to be
located in the county in which a majority of the
construction costs will be expended, provided that upon a
request from the county commissioners of an adjoining
county to the industrial siting council, the council may
determine that the social and economic impacts from
construction of the industrial facility or federal or state
government project upon the adjoining county are
significant and establish the ratio of impacts between the
SF0019

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0069
counties and certify that ratio to the department of
revenue who will thereafter distribute the impact
assistance payment to the counties pursuant to that ratio.
Each county, city and town that receives a distribution
under this subsection shall provide an annual report to the
industrial siting council describing how the impact
assistance payment was expended. The report shall first be
submitted not later than one (1) year after the impact
assistance payment is approved and annually each year
thereafter for the duration in which distributions are made
and until all distributions are expended. The industrial
siting council shall adopt rules as necessary to implement
this subsection.

(e) As used in subsection subsections (d) and (p) of
this section:

(p) For industrial facilities for which the total
estimated materials costs exceed three hundred fifty
million dollars ($350,000,000.00), the industrial siting
council may increase the maximum allowable percentage of
any impact assistance payment to not more than two and
SF0019

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0069
seventy-six hundredths percent (2.76%) in accordance with
the following:

(i) The council shall include in the specific
findings required under subsection (d) of this section that
the maximum allowable percentage, as applicable, for the
industrial facility is insufficient to mitigate the
identified impacts;

(ii) Upon making the findings required in
paragraph (i) of this subsection, the council shall forward
the proposed percentage increase, the permit order or
decision and, if requested by the board, the record of the
hearing, to the state loan and investment board. The board
shall not accept or consider any new evidence in its
consideration under this paragraph. Not later than the next
regularly scheduled board meeting after receiving a
proposed percentage increase for an impact assistance
payment, the state loan and investment board shall consider
the council's proposed percentage increase and shall:

(A) Approve the proposed percentage
increase;
SF0019

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0069

(B) Deny the proposed percentage increase;
or

(C) Modify the proposed percentage increase
to any percentage between the maximum allowable percentage
as specified under subsection (d) of this section and two
and seventy-six hundredths percent (2.76%).

(iii) The council shall authorize that payments
made under subsection (d) of this section be made at a
percentage not to exceed the applicable maximum allowable
percentage specified in subsection (d) of this section
while the proposed percentage increase is pending before
the state loan and investment board;

(iv) If the state loan and investment board
approves or modifies the proposed percentage increase under
paragraph (ii) of this subsection and upon direction by the
council, the department shall make payments in an amount
sufficient to make the payments equal to the amount
necessary to make the impact assistance payment's increased
SF0019

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0069
percentage retroactive to the beginning of the period of
construction;

(v) The decision of the state loan and
investment board to approve, deny or modify a proposed
percentage increase under paragraph (ii) of this subsection
is final and shall not be subject to further review by the
industrial siting council or subject to any judicial
review. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to
abrogate any other right of review specified in the
Industrial Development Information and Siting Act.

Section 2. This act shall only apply to impact
assistance payments for industrial facility permit
applications submitted on and after the effective date of
this act.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0019